Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2910.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1133.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1133.01. Administrative recovery; statute of limitations A. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, if a contractor license has been revoked or suspended as a result of an order to remedy a violation of this chapter, the registrar may order payment from the residential contractors' recovery fund to remedy the violation. B. The registrar must serve the contractor with a notice setting forth the amount claimed or to be awarded. C. If the contractor contests the amount or propriety of the payment, the contractor must respond in writing within ten days after the date of service by requesting a hearing to determine the amount or propriety of the payment. The contractor's failure to respond in writing within ten twenty days after the date of service may be deemed a waiver by the contractor of the right to contest the amount claimed or to be awarded. D. Service of the notice required by subsection B of this section may be made by personal service to the contractor or by mailing a copy of the notice by certified mail with postage prepaid to the contractor's latest address of record on file in the registrar's office. E. If service is made by certified mail, it is effective five days after the notice is mailed. Except as provided in section 41-1092.08, subsection H, the contractor or claimant may seek judicial review of the registrar's final award pursuant to title 12, chapter 7, article 6. F. A claimant to the residential contractors' recovery fund pursuant to this section must show that the claimant has proceeded against any existing bond covering the residential contractor. G. A claim for payment from the residential contractor's recovery fund must be submitted within two years after all proceedings, reviews and appeals connected with the registrar's final order terminate. END_STATUTE